zh-CN: 仿生鱼饵浮力: 快沉型; 浮水型; 中速下沉型; 悬浮型/中性浮力; 慢浮型; 慢沉型; 悬停型; 水面滑行型; 尾波/水面型; 其他
sk-SK: Vztlak návnady: Rýchle klesanie; Plávajúce; Mierne klesanie; Neutrálne nadnášanie; Pomalé stúpanie; Pomalé klesanie; Vznášajúce sa; Kĺzanie po hladine; Na vodnej hladine; Iné
fr: Flottabilité du swimbait: Coulée rapide; Flottant; Coulée modérée; Flottabilité neutre; Flottaison lente; Coulée lente; Suspending; Glisse en surface; Sillage/surface; Autre
ja: スイムベイトの浮力: ファストシンキング; フローティング; モデレートシンキング; 中性浮力; スローフローティング; スローシンキング; サスペンド; トップウォーターグライド; ウェイク/サーフェス; その他
nb: Oppdrift for swimbait: Raskt synkende; Flytende; Moderat synkende; Nøytral oppdrift; Sakte flytende; Sakte synkende; Svevende; Overflateglide; Kjølvann/overflate; Annet
ro-RO: Flotabilitatea nălucii: Scufundare rapidă; Plutitor; Scufundare moderată; Flotabilitate neutră; Plutire lentă; Scufundare lentă; Suspendat; Alunecare la suprafață; Urmă/suprafață; Altele
vi: Độ nổi của mồi giả: Chìm nhanh; Nổi; Chìm vừa phải; Độ nổi trung tính; Nổi chậm; Chìm chậm; Lơ lửng; Lướt mặt nước; Tạo sóng/Mặt nước; Khác
pt-PT: Flutuabilidade da isca de pesca: Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Afundamento moderado; Flutuabilidade neutra; Flutuabilidade lenta; Afundamento lento; Em suspensão; Deslize à superfície; Esteira/superfície; Outro
hu: Műcsali úszóképessége: Gyorsan süllyedő; Felúszó (floating); Közepesen süllyedő; Semleges felhajtóerejű (lebegő); Lassan felúszó; Lassan süllyedő; Lebegő (suspending); Vízfelszíni sikló (topwater glide); Vízfelszíni (wake/surface); Egyéb
es: Flotabilidad del señuelo: Hundimiento rápido; Flotante; Hundimiento moderado; Flotabilidad neutra; Flotación lenta; Hundimiento lento; Suspensión; Deslizamiento en superficie; Estela/superficie; Otra
pt-BR: Swimbait flutuabilidade: Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Afundamento moderado; Flutuabilidade neutra; Flutuação lenta; Afundamento lento; Suspensão; Deslizamento na superfície; Esteira/Superfície; Outro
tr: Yem yüzdürme özelliği: Hızlı batan; Yüzen; Orta hızda batan; Nötr yüzdürme; Yavaş yüzen; Yavaş batan; Askıda kalan; Su üstü kayan; İz bırakan/yüzey; Diğer
fi: Uintivieheen kelluvuusominaisuus: Nopeasti uppoava; Kelluva; Kohtalaisesti uppoava; Neutraali kelluvuus; Hitaasti kelluva; Hitaasti uppoava; Leijuva; Pintavesiliuku; Vana/pinta; Muu
ru: Плавучесть свимбейта: Быстро тонущий; Плавающий; Умеренно тонущий; Нейтральная плавучесть; Медленно всплывающий; Медленно тонущий; Суспендер (с нейтральной плавучестью); Поверхностный глайдер; Поверхностный/вейкбейт; Другое
sl-SI: Plovnost varljive ribice: Hitro toneča; Plavajoča; Zmerno toneča; Nevtralna plovnost; Počasi plavajoča; Počasi toneča; Lebdeča; Zgornja drsna vaba; Površinska (wake/surface); Drugo
ko: 스윔베이트의 부력: 패스트 싱킹; 플로팅; 모더레이트 싱킹; 중성 부력; 슬로우 플로팅; 슬로우 싱킹; 서스펜딩; 탑워터 글라이드; 웨이크/서피스; 기타
hr-HR: Plovnost Swimbaita: Brzo tonuće; Plutajuće; Umjereno tonuće; Neutralna plovnost; Sporo plutajuće; Sporo tonuće; Suspensijsko (lebdeće); Klizeće površinsko; Površinsko; Ostalo
cs: Vztlak plavky: Rychle potápivé; Plovoucí; Mírně potápivé; Neutrální vztlak; Pomalu vyplouvající; Pomalu potápivé; Vznášivé; Klouzavé po hladině; Hladinové; Jiné
nl: Swimbait drijfvermogen: Snel zinkend; Drijvend; Matig zinkend; Neutraal drijfvermogen; Langzaam drijvend; Langzaam zinkend; Suspending; Topwater glide; Wake/oppervlakte; Overig
da: Opdrift for swimbait: Hurtigtsynkende; Flydende; Moderat synkende; Neutral opdrift; Langsomt flydende; Langsomt synkende; Svævende; Topwater-glide; Kølvand/overflade; Andet
zh-TW: 泳餌浮力: 快速下沉; 浮水; 中速下沉; 中性浮力; 緩慢上浮; 緩慢下沉; 懸浮; 水面滑行; 尾流/水面; 其他
de: Auftrieb des Swimbaits: Schnell sinkend; Schwimmend; Mäßig sinkend; Schwebend; Langsam auftreibend; Langsam sinkend; Schwebend; Topwater-Glide; Wake/Oberfläche; Sonstige
en: Swimbait buoyancy: Fast sinking; Floating; Moderate sinking; Neutral buoyancy; Slow floating; Slow sinking; Suspending; Topwater glide; Wake/surface; Other
bg-BG: Плаваемост на плаващата примамка: Бързо потъваща; Плаваща; Умерено потъваща; Неутрална плаваемост; Бавно изплуваща; Бавно потъваща; Зависваща; Повърхностно плъзгаща се; Повърхностна/за вълни; Друго
el: Πλευστότητα Swimbait: Ταχείας βύθισης; Επιπλέον; Μέτριας βύθισης; Ουδέτερης πλευστότητας; Αργής επίπλευσης; Αργής βύθισης; Αιωρούμενο; Ολίσθηση επιφάνειας; Απόνερων/Επιφάνειας; Άλλο
th: การลอยตัวของเหยื่อปลอมแบบว่ายน้ำ: จมเร็ว; ลอย; จมปานกลาง; ลอยตัวเป็นกลาง; ลอยช้า; จมช้า; แขวนลอย; ร่อนบนผิวน้ำ; เหยื่อผิวน้ำ/น้ำตื้น; อื่นๆ
sv: Swimbait flytkraft: Snabbsjunkande; Flytande; Måttligt sjunkande; Neutral flytkraft; Långsamt flytande; Långsamt sjunkande; Svävande; Ytgående glide; Yta/wake; Annan
pl: Wyporność swimbaita: Szybko tonąca; Pływająca; Umiarkowanie tonąca; Neutralna wyporność; Powoli wypływająca; Wolno tonąca; Suspending; Powierzchniowa typu glide; Smugowa / powierzchniowa; Inna
it: Galleggiabilità dello swimbait: Ad affondamento rapido; Galleggiante; Ad affondamento moderato; A galleggiabilità neutra; A galleggiamento lento; Ad affondamento lento; Sospeso; Glide topwater; Wake/di superficie; Altro
lt-LT: Plaukiančio masalo plūdrumas: Greitai skęstantis; Plūduriuojantis; Vidutiniškai skęstantis; Neutralaus plūdrumo; Lėtai iškylantis; Lėtai skęstantis; Pakibantis; Paviršinis slydimas; Bangų sukėlimo / paviršinis; Kita